motorola-external-hunspell/motorola/external/hunspell/dicts/it_IT/it_IT.dic
abdurre/VTjI
contrarre/VJjI
decontrarre/VjI
deporre/VjI
disporre/VJjI
esporre/VJTjI
fotocomporre/VjI
giustapporre/VjI
indisporre/VTjI
infrapporre/VTjI
introdurre/VTjI
porre/VJjI
predisporre/VjI
presupporre/VjI
proporre/VJjI
redarre/VjI
ridurre/VjI
scomporre/VjI
soprapporre/VjI
sottoporre/VjI
sovraesporre/VjI
sovrapporre/VjI
sovrimporre/VjI
telecomporre/VjI
trarre/VJjI
trasporre/VjI
